District of Columbia statutes.
22-1301

Affrays.

Whoever is convicted of an affray in the District shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both.

History

July 16, 1912, 37 Stat. 192, ch. 235, § 1
Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 617, Pub. L. 88-241, § 11(a)
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 107, 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 203(a)(1), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Assaults because of gaming losses, see § 22-408.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1101.
1973 Ed., § 22-1101.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 107 of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 203(a)(1) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.